Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.281

Electric vehicle infrastructure—Rule adoption.

The director shall adopt by rule standards for the installation of electric vehicle infrastructure, including all wires and equipment that convey electric current and any equipment to be operated by electric current, in, on, or about buildings or structures. The rules must be consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

[ 2009 c 459 s 17.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—2009 c 459: See note following RCW 47.80.090.

Regional transportation planning organizations—Electric vehicle infrastructure: RCW 47.80.090.